Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,256
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the New Taxpayer Recruitment Grant Act.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 116.
July 18, 2026